Wisconsin, session 2025, AB411.
do enact as follows:AB411,11Section 1. 93.07 (25) of the statutes is created to read:AB411,2,10293.07 (25) Farmland Link program. (a) To establish and maintain within 3the department’s farm center a farmland link program that connects property 4owners and agricultural operators with individuals seeking to use land exclusively 5for agricultural purposes. As part of the farmland link program created under this 6paragraph, the department may provide assistance regarding the transfer of land 7and other property to be used exclusively for agricultural purposes, collaborate with 8nonprofit organizations to facilitate connection between parties participating in the 9farmland link program, and publish informational resources related to the 10farmland link program.AB411,2,1611(b) To establish and maintain a publicly accessible website for the farmland 12link program under par. (a). The department shall, no later than 12 months after 13the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], and annually thereafter, 14submit to the governor and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature 15under s. 13.172 (3) a report regarding the number of farms, acres, and users that 16the farmland link program has served in the preceding year.AB411,2,1717